District of Columbia statutes.
38-2001.19

Application of subchapter — Annuities under prior act.

The provisions of this subchapter shall apply to: (1) all teachers who were on the rolls of the public schools of the District of Columbia for the month of June, 1926, if otherwise eligible; and (2) all teachers who, on June 30, 1926, were receiving an annuity under the provisions of this subchapter, the annuity to be paid each such teacher after June 30, 1926, to be computed in the manner provided herein; provided, that nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to require a reduction in the amount of the annuity being paid to any teacher on July 1, 1926.

Jan. 15, 1920, 41 Stat. 389, ch. 39, § 19
June 11, 1926, 44 Stat. 731, ch. 556, § 1
Federal City College, assumption of the District of Columbia Teachers College, retirement benefits of educational employees, election, see § 38-1103.
Schoolteachers, retirees, reemployment as substitute teachers, see § 38-1910.
1981 Ed., § 31-1219.
1973 Ed., § 31-720.